New Jersey, session 222, S3383.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, the Tuition Aid Grant award table adopted annually by the Higher Education Student Assistance Authority shall provide that the tuition aid grant award values, which students attending State colleges and universities and public research universities on a full-time basis are entitled to receive based upon their financial need, are equal to the tuition aid grant award values that students attending independent institutions of higher education on a full-time basis are entitled to receive based upon their financial need, except that the tuition aid grant shall not exceed the actual cost of tuition at the four-year public institution. 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall first apply to the first full academic year following the date of enactment.